klpt/data/ckb-Arab.aff
PFX I Y 204
PFX I 0 ب .
PFX I 0 بش .
PFX I 0 نە .
PFX I 0 نەش .
PFX I 0 دە .
PFX I 0 دەش .
PFX I 0 نەدە .
PFX I 0 نەشدە .
PFX I 0 ئە .
PFX I 0 ئەش .
PFX I 0 نەئە .
PFX I 0 نەشئە .
PFX I 0 دا .
PFX I 0 داش .
PFX I 0 دانە .
PFX I 0 داشنە .
PFX I 0 دادە .
PFX I 0 داشدە .
PFX I 0 دانەدە .
PFX I 0 داشنەدە .
PFX I 0 دائە .
PFX I 0 داشئە .
PFX I 0 دانەئە .
PFX I 0 داشنەئە .
PFX I 0 ڕا .
PFX I 0 ڕاش .
PFX I 0 ڕانە .
PFX I 0 ڕاشنە .
PFX I 0 ڕادە .
PFX I 0 ڕاشدە .
PFX I 0 ڕانەدە .
PFX I 0 ڕاشنەدە .
PFX I 0 ڕائە .
PFX I 0 ڕاشئە .
PFX I 0 ڕانەئە .
PFX I 0 ڕاشنەئە .
PFX I 0 هەڵ .
PFX I 0 هەڵیش .
PFX I 0 هەڵنە .
PFX I 0 هەڵیشنە .
PFX I 0 هەڵدە .
PFX I 0 هەڵیشدە .
PFX I 0 هەڵنەدە .
PFX I 0 هەڵیشنەدە .
PFX I 0 هەڵئە .
PFX I 0 هەڵیشئە .
PFX I 0 هەڵنەئە .
PFX I 0 هەڵیشنەئە .
PFX I 0 وەر .
PFX I 0 وەریش .
PFX I 0 وەرنە .
PFX I 0 وەریشنە .
PFX I 0 وەردە .
PFX I 0 وەریشدە .
PFX I 0 وەرنەدە .
PFX I 0 وەریشنەدە .
PFX I 0 وەرئە .
PFX I 0 وەریشئە .
PFX I 0 وەرنەئە .
PFX I 0 وەریشنەئە .
PFX I 0 ڕۆ .
PFX I 0 ڕۆش .
PFX I 0 ڕۆنە .
PFX I 0 ڕۆشنە .
PFX I 0 ڕۆدە .
PFX I 0 ڕۆشدە .
PFX I 0 ڕۆنەدە .
PFX I 0 ڕۆشنەدە .
PFX I 0 ڕۆئە .
PFX I 0 ڕۆشئە .
PFX I 0 ڕۆنەئە .
PFX I 0 ڕۆشنەئە .
PFX I 0 بەر .
PFX I 0 بەرنە .
PFX I 0 بەریش .
PFX I 0 بەریشنە .
PFX I 0 بەردە .
PFX I 0 بەریشدە .
PFX I 0 بەرنەدە .
PFX I 0 بەریشنەدە .
PFX I 0 بەرئە .
PFX I 0 بەریشئە .
PFX I 0 بەرنەئە .
PFX I 0 بەریشنەئە .
PFX I 0 دەر .
PFX I 0 دەریش .
PFX I 0 دەرنە .
PFX I 0 دەریشنە .
PFX I 0 دەردە .
PFX I 0 دەریشدە .
PFX I 0 دەرنەدە .
PFX I 0 دەریشنەدە .
PFX I 0 دەرئە .
PFX I 0 دەریشئە .
PFX I 0 دەرنەئە .
PFX I 0 دەریشنەئە .
PFX I 0 سەر .
PFX I 0 سەرنە .
PFX I 0 سەریش .
PFX I 0 سەریشنە .
PFX I 0 سەردە .
PFX I 0 سەریشدە .
PFX I 0 سەرنەدە .
PFX I 0 سەریشنەدە .
PFX I 0 سەرئە .
PFX I 0 سەریشئە .
PFX I 0 سەرنەئە .
PFX I 0 سەریشنەئە .
PFX I 0 وێ .
PFX I 0 وێش .
PFX I 0 وێنە .
PFX I 0 وێشنە .
PFX I 0 وێدە .
PFX I 0 وێشدە .
PFX I 0 وێنەدە .
PFX I 0 وێشنەدە .
PFX I 0 وێئە .
PFX I 0 وێشئە .
PFX I 0 وێنەئە .
PFX I 0 وێشنەئە .
PFX I 0 وێک .
PFX I 0 وێکنە .
PFX I 0 وێکیش .
PFX I 0 وێکیشنە .
PFX I 0 وێکدە .
PFX I 0 وێکیشدە .
PFX I 0 وێکنەدە .
PFX I 0 وێکیشنەدە .
PFX I 0 وێکئە .
PFX I 0 وێکیشئە .
PFX I 0 وێکنەئە .
PFX I 0 وێکیشنەئە .
PFX I 0 لێ .
PFX I 0 لێش .
PFX I 0 لێنە .
PFX I 0 لێشنە .
PFX I 0 لێدە .
PFX I 0 لێشدە .
PFX I 0 لێنەدە .
PFX I 0 لێشنەدە .
PFX I 0 لێئە .
PFX I 0 لێشئە .
PFX I 0 لێنەئە .
PFX I 0 لێشنەئە .
PFX I 0 لێک .
PFX I 0 لێکنە .
PFX I 0 لێکیش .
PFX I 0 لێکیشنە .
PFX I 0 لێکدە .
PFX I 0 لێکیشدە .
PFX I 0 لێکنەدە .
PFX I 0 لێکیشنەدە .
PFX I 0 لێکئە .
PFX I 0 لێکیشئە .
PFX I 0 لێکنەئە .
PFX I 0 لێکیشنەئە .
PFX I 0 پێ .
PFX I 0 پێش .
PFX I 0 پێنە .
PFX I 0 پێشنە .
PFX I 0 پێدە .
PFX I 0 پێشدە .
PFX I 0 پێنەدە .
PFX I 0 پێشنەدە .
PFX I 0 پێئە .
PFX I 0 پێشئە .
PFX I 0 پێنەئە .
PFX I 0 پێشنەئە .
PFX I 0 پێک .
PFX I 0 پێکنە .
PFX I 0 پێکیش .
PFX I 0 پێکیشنە .
PFX I 0 پێکدە .
PFX I 0 پێکیشدە .
PFX I 0 پێکنەدە .
PFX I 0 پێکیشنەدە .
PFX I 0 پێکئە .
PFX I 0 پێکیشئە .
PFX I 0 پێکنەئە .
PFX I 0 پێکیشنەئە .
PFX I 0 تێ .
PFX I 0 تێش .
PFX I 0 تێنە .
PFX I 0 تێشنە .
PFX I 0 تێدە .
PFX I 0 تێشدە .
PFX I 0 تێنەدە .
PFX I 0 تێشنەدە .
PFX I 0 تێئە .
PFX I 0 تێشئە .
PFX I 0 تێنەئە .
PFX I 0 تێشنەئە .
PFX I 0 تێک .
PFX I 0 تێکنە .
PFX I 0 تێکیش .
PFX I 0 تێکیشنە .
PFX I 0 تێکدە .
PFX I 0 تێکیشدە .
PFX I 0 تێکنەدە .
PFX I 0 تێکیشنەدە .
PFX I 0 تێکئە .
PFX I 0 تێکیشئە .
PFX I 0 تێکنەئە .
PFX I 0 تێکیشنەئە .
